Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.520

Felony conviction—Restoration of voting rights.

(1) For a felony conviction in a Washington state court, the right to vote is automatically restored as long as the person is not serving a sentence of total confinement under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. For a felony conviction in a federal court or any state court other than a Washington state court, the right to vote is automatically restored as long as the person is no longer incarcerated. A person who has been convicted of a felony and is either sentenced to a term of total confinement under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections or otherwise incarcerated as provided for in this subsection must reregister to vote prior to voting.

(2) At least once a month, the secretary of state shall compare the list of registered voters to a list of persons who are not eligible to vote as provided in subsection (1) of this section. If a registered voter is not eligible to vote as provided in this section, the secretary of state or county auditor shall confirm the match through a date of birth comparison and suspend the voter registration from the official state voter registration list. The secretary of state or county auditor shall send to the person at his or her last known voter registration address and at the department of corrections, if the person is serving a sentence of total confinement under the jurisdiction of the department, a notice of the proposed cancellation and an explanation of the requirements for restoring the right to vote and reregistering. To the extent possible, the secretary of state shall time the comparison required by this subsection to allow notice and cancellation of voting rights for ineligible voters prior to a primary or general election.

(3) For the purposes of this section, a sentence of total confinement does not include confinement imposed as a sanction for a community custody violation under RCW 9.94A.633(1).

[ 2021 c 10 s 1; 2013 c 11 s 19. Prior: (2009 c 369 s 27 repealed by 2013 c 11 s 95); 2009 c 325 s 1; 2005 c 246 s 15; 2004 c 267 s 126; 2003 c 111 s 233; prior: 1994 c 57 s 42. Formerly RCW 29.10.097.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 10: "This act takes effect January 1, 2022." [ 2021 c 10 s 8.]

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Restoration of civil rights: RCW 9.92.066, 9.94A.637, 9.94A.885, 9.95.260, chapter 9.96 RCW.